Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.100

Summons or other notification issued upon filing of information—Procedure—Order to take juvenile into custody—Contempt of court, when.

(1) Upon the filing of an information the alleged offender shall be notified by summons, warrant, or other method approved by the court of the next required court appearance.

(2) If notice is by summons, the clerk of the court shall issue a summons directed to the juvenile, if the juvenile is twelve or more years of age, and another to the parents, guardian, or custodian, and such other persons as appear to the court to be proper or necessary parties to the proceedings, requiring them to appear personally before the court at the time fixed to hear the petition. Where the custodian is summoned, the parent or guardian or both shall also be served with a summons.

(3) A copy of the information shall be attached to each summons.

(4) The summons shall advise the parties of the right to counsel.

(5) The judge may endorse upon the summons an order directing the parents, guardian, or custodian having the custody or control of the juvenile to bring the juvenile to the hearing.

(6) If it appears from affidavit or sworn statement presented to the judge that there is probable cause for the issuance of a warrant of arrest or that the juvenile needs to be taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050, the judge may endorse upon the summons an order that an officer serving the summons shall at once take the juvenile into custody and take the juvenile to the place of detention or shelter designated by the court.

(7) Service of summons may be made under the direction of the court by any law enforcement officer or probation counselor.

(8) If the person summoned as herein provided fails without reasonable cause to appear and abide the order of the court, the person may be proceeded against as for contempt of court. In determining whether a parent, guardian, or custodian had reasonable cause not to appear, the court may consider all factors relevant to the person's ability to appear as summoned.

[ 1997 c 338 s 19; 1979 c 155 s 62; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 64.]

NOTES:

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.